Missouri, session 2026, SB1733.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 160.666 and 160.667,
to read as follows:
160.666. 1. This section and section 160.667 shall be
known and may be cited as "Alyssa's Law".
2. Beginning with the 2027-28 school year and
continuing in all subsequent school years, each local
educational agency shall implement a wearable panic alert
system at each school facility capable of integrating with
local public safety answering point infrastructure to
transmit 911 calls or mobile activations.
3. In accordance with the emergency operations plan
developed under section 160.480, a local educational agency
shall provide each staff person with a wearable panic alert
device to communicate throughout each school campus that
allows for immediate contact with local emergency response
agencies.
4. The wearable panic alert system shall be capable of
initiating a campus-wide emergency notification, such as a
lockdown. Notifications shall include automated visual
strobes whose colors map to the emergency protocol; an

SB 1733 2
automated, direct connection to the intercom or public
announcement (PA) infrastructure in place that maps to the
emergency protocol; and an automated computer display
takeover message that maps to the emergency protocol.
5. Upon activation of an alert, the wearable panic
alert system shall provide accurate location information at
the room and floor level inside the facility and specific
areas such as parking lots, playgrounds, athletic fields,
and similar areas that are part of the school grounds.
6. A local educational agency shall ensure, before the
school year begins, all school building personnel receive
training on the emergency protocols and appropriate use of
the panic alert device described in subsection 3 of this
section.
160.667. 1. A local educational agency shall ensure,
before the school year begins, that emergency response
mapping is made available by the provider of the wearable
panic alert system required pursuant to section 160.666, at
no cost to the local educational agency, to local first
responder agencies, in an electronic or digital format, to
assist first responders in responding to emergencies at
schools. Emergency response maps shall:
(1) Be compatible with security software platforms in
use by the specific school for which the data is provided
without requiring the local law enforcement agencies or
school districts to purchase additional software or
requiring the integration of third-party software to view
the data;
(2) Be oriented true north;
(3) Be overlaid on school floor plans;
(4) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the
structure of school buildings, including room labels,

SB 1733 3
hallway names, and external door or stairwell numbers and
locations of critical utility feeds, emergency equipment
such as automated external defibrillators (AEDs), trauma
kits, and NARCAN kits;
(5) Be capable of creating and managing electronic
asset tags that allow the local educational agency to know
the unique identifier of the devices such as the serial
number, last inspection date, battery replacement date such
as battery replacement date for the AED, expiration date
such as the NARCAN kit expiration date, and other
information pertinent to the appropriate operation of the
asset;
(6) Have the ability to provide real time updates by
building owners with role-based logins to the emergency
response maps, where changes are automatically disseminated
to emergency responders and 911 mapping applications using
existing data in order to ensure the most up-to-date
information. Updates shall include changes to the physical
structure such as walls, doors, and mobile classrooms, along
with changes to the asset tags; and
(7) Have ownership retained by the local educational
agency with full rights to copy, display, distribute,
transmit, and adapt for all lawful purposes, including
sharing with government or private entities that are
providing or supporting emergency services.
2. A local educational agency shall:
(1) Ensure all security data, including data from all
cameras, maps, and access control within a school building,
are accessible by a local law enforcement agency; and
(2) Coordinate with a local law enforcement agency to
establish appropriate access protocols.

SB 1733 4
3. Any records, information, photographs, audio and
visual presentations, schematic diagrams, surveys,
recommendations, or consultations, or portions thereof,
relating directly to the physical security or fire safety of
the school facility or revealing security or fire safety
systems held by a local educational agency are confidential
and exempt from public disclosure under chapter 610.
4. Information made confidential and exempt from
public disclosure under subsection 3 of this section may be
disclosed:
(1) To the property owner or local educational
agency's leaseholder;
(2) In furtherance of the official duties and
responsibilities of the agency holding the information;
(3) To another local, state, or federal agency in
furtherance of that agency's official duties and
responsibilities; or
(4) Upon a showing of good cause before a court of
competent jurisdiction.
5. The state board of education may promulgate rules
to implement this section as are necessary to protect the
health and safety of students and educators. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

SB 1733 5
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓